Hawaii statutes.
§661-5 Limitations on action. Every
claim against the State, cognizable under this part, shall be forever barred
unless the action is commenced within two years after the claim first accrues;
provided that the claims of persons under legal disability shall not be barred
if the action is commenced within one year after the disability has ceased. [L
1894-5, c 26, §5; RL 1925, §2673; RL 1935, §4424; RL 1945, §10479; RL 1955,
§245-5; HRS §661-5; am L 1972, c 164, §1(e); am L 2016, c 55, §44]

Cross References

Actions on contract for loss in connection with registered
land, see §501-217.

Case Notes

Court on own motion will dismiss action if not brought within
time limited, namely, two years. 11 H. 404 (1898).

Claim accrues when the plaintiff knew or should have known
that an actionable wrong has been committed. 63 H. 117, 621 P.2d 957 (1980).

Lawsuit seeking judicial review of employees' retirement
system declaratory order not time-barred. 75 H. 42, 856 P.2d 1227 (1993).

Where employees' retirement system trustees were alleging in
lawsuit that Act 100, L 1999 was unconstitutional as being violative of article
XVI, §2 of the Hawaii constitution, their claims were not "founded upon
any statute of the State; or upon any regulation of an executive department; or
upon any contract" and were not referred to the court by the legislature;
thus, trustees' claims were not cognizable under chapter 661, and, therefore, were
not subject to the statute of limitations set forth in this section. 114 H.
302, 162 P.3d 696 (2007).

The circuit court did not err in summarily ruling that this
section barred claims against the State for back pay prior to November 8, 2000
where there was nothing in the record to indicate why plaintiffs could not have
brought their claims within the two-year statute of limitations period and
there was no "extraordinary circumstance". 122 H. 150 (App.), 223
P.3d 215 (2009).

Under the "continuing tort doctrine", while the
statute of limitations is "tolled" by a continuing tortious act, recovery
may be had only for damages accruing within the statutory period before the
action, but not for damages accrued prior to that period; thus, the statute of
limitations applicable to periodic pay claims begins to run on each paycheck as
it becomes due and plaintiffs' claims for back pay due prior to November 8,
2000 were barred by this section, but their claims for pay due from that date
onward were not barred by the statute of limitations. 122 H. 150 (App.), 223
P.3d 215 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next